Utah statutes.
34-34-15.   Existing contracts -- Chapter applicable upon renewal or extension.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any lawful contract in force on the effective date of this act, but they shall apply in all respects to contracts entered into after such date and to any renewal or extension of any existing contract.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

